Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-521
Power of eminent domain; procedure.

Whenever the board of trustees of any sanitary district shall by order determine to make any public improvement under sections 31-501 to 31-523 which shall require that private property be taken or damaged, the district may exercise the power of eminent domain for that purpose. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1891, c. 36, § 12, p. 292;

R.S.1913, § 1936;

C.S.1922, § 1877;

C.S.1929, § 31-615;

R.S.1943, § 31-521;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 76, p. 481.